New Jersey, session 222, A5429.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  A school district shall receive additional State transportation aid in any school year in which: a.  the number of regular nonpublic school students eligible for transportation pursuant to N.J.S.18A:39-1 exceeds the number of regular education public school students eligible for transportation pursuant to N.J.S.18A:39-1.  The additional State transportation aid for a school district under this subsection shall equal 50 percent of the difference between the amount of State transportation aid received by the school district on a per pupil basis and the actual cost of providing transportation to nonpublic school students who are eligible for transportation pursuant to N.J.S.18A:39-1 on a per pupil basis, multiplied by the number of nonpublic school students who are eligible for transportation pursuant to  N.J.S.18A:39-1; or b.  the number of regular nonpublic school students eligible for transportation pursuant to N.J.S.18A:39-1 exceeds the number of regular education public school students eligible for transportation pursuant to N.J.S.18A:39-1 by 25 percent or more.  The additional State transportation aid for a school district under this subsection shall equal 100 percent of the difference between the amount of State transportation aid received by the school district on a per pupil basis and the actual cost of providing transportation to nonpublic school students who are eligible for transportation pursuant to  N.J.S.18A:39-1 on a per pupil basis, multiplied by the number of nonpublic school students who are eligible for transportation pursuant to N.J.S.18A:39-1. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.